Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.08.040

Notice to file articles—Articles approved or refused—Hearing.

After the director is satisfied of the above facts, and, within six months of the date the notice of intention to organize has been received in his or her office, the director shall notify the incorporators to file executed articles of incorporation with the director in triplicate. Unless the director otherwise consents in writing, such articles shall be in the same form and shall contain the same information as the proposed articles and shall be filed with the director within ten days of such notice. Within thirty days after the receipt of such articles of incorporation, the director shall endorse upon each of the triplicates thereof, over his or her official signature, the word "approved," or the word "refused," with the date of such endorsement. In case of refusal the director shall forthwith return one of the triplicates, so endorsed, together with a statement explaining the reason for refusal to the person from whom the articles were received, which refusal shall be conclusive, unless the incorporators, within ten days of the issuance of such notice of refusal, shall request a hearing pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW, as now or hereafter amended.

[ 1995 c 134 s 4. Prior: 1994 c 256 s 43; 1994 c 92 s 45; 1981 c 302 s 15; 1973 1st ex.s. c 104 s 6; 1955 c 33 s 30.08.040; prior: 1929 c 72 s 3, part; 1923 c 115 s 5, part; 1917 c 80 s 22, part; RRS s 3229, part. Formerly RCW 30.08.040.]

NOTES:

Findings—Construction—1994 c 256: See RCW 43.320.007.

Severability—1981 c 302: See note following RCW 19.76.100.